Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6602
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Insurance Fraud Act is to confront the problem of insurance fraud in Nebraska by facilitating the detection of insurance fraud, eliminating the occurrence of insurance fraud through the development of fraud prevention programs, authorizing imposition of civil penalties, authorizing restitution of fraudulently obtained insurance benefits, and reducing the amount of premium dollars used to pay fraudulent claims.

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 2.